Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 14. Miscellaneous.

§ 13.1-1282.
Construction and application of chapter and governing instrument.

The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this chapter.

This chapter shall be construed in furtherance of the policies of giving maximum effect to the principle of freedom of contract and of enforcing governing instruments.

To the extent any provision of this chapter is inconsistent with the provisions of Sections 856 through 859 of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or any successor provision, such provisions of the Internal Revenue Code shall prevail with respect to any business trust formed under this chapter that also qualifies as a real estate investment trust under such provisions.

History.

2002, c. 621.

Effective date.

This chapter became effective October 1, 2003.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

§ 13.1-1283.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The General Assembly shall have the power to amend or repeal all or part of this chapter at any time and all domestic and foreign business trusts subject to this chapter shall be subject to the amendment or repeal.

History.

2002, c. 621.

§ 13.1-1284.
Application to existing real estate investment trusts and foreign business trusts.

Unless otherwise provided, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to all real estate investment trusts created under former Chapter 9 (§ 6-577 et seq.) of Title 6 and Chapter 9 (§ 6.1-343 et seq.) of Title 6.1 as in effect immediately prior to the effective date of this chapter. The declaration of trust of every such real estate investment trust heretofore organized in this Commonwealth shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

2002, c. 621.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3A M.J. Banks and Banking, § 120.

§ 13.1-1285.
Property title records.

Whenever the records in the office of the clerk of the Commission reflect that a domestic or foreign business trust has changed or corrected its name, merged into a domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership or partnership, converted into a domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership or partnership, or domesticated in or from another jurisdiction, the clerk of the Commission, upon request, shall issue a certificate reciting such change, correction, merger, conversion or domestication. The certificate may be admitted to record in the deed books, in accordance with §

17.1-227

, of any clerk’s office within the jurisdiction of which any property of the business trust is located in order to maintain the continuity of title records. The person filing the certificate shall pay a fee of $10 to the clerk of the court, but no tax shall be due thereon.

Whenever a foreign business trust has changed or corrected its name, merged into a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership or partnership, converted into another type of business entity, or domesticated in another jurisdiction, and it cannot or chooses not to obtain a certificate reciting such change, correction, merger, conversion or domestication from the clerk of the Commission pursuant to subsection A, a similar certificate by any competent authority of the foreign business trust’s jurisdiction of formation may be admitted to record in the deed books, in accordance with §

17.1-227

, of any clerk’s office within the jurisdiction of which any property of the business trust is located in order to maintain the continuity of title records. The person filing the certificate shall pay a fee of $10 to the clerk of the court, but no tax shall be due thereon.

History.

2007, c. 771.